Illinois, session 104th, HB4243.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Pharmacy Practice Act is amended by adding 5Section 15.2 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 85/15.2 new)7    Sec. 15.2. Retail pharmacy; pharmacist on site. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "retail pharmacy" means a 9store, shop, or other place where drugs, medicines, or poisons 10are dispensed, sold, or offered for sale at retail.11    (b) A retail pharmacy that, on average, receives 150 or 12more prescription drug orders during its operating hours must 13satisfy one of the following requirements during all times 14that the pharmacy remains open for the transaction of 15business:16        (1) a pharmacist is present at the location and 17    working in his or her capacity as a pharmacist; or18        (2) a registered pharmacy technician, registered 19    certified pharmacy technician, student pharmacist, or 20    other supportive staff that is authorized to sell 21    prescriptions is present at the location and working in 22    that capacity pursuant to subsection (c-5) of Section 23    15.1.